Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5761YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 2169 Section 1. IOWA FINANCE AUTHORITY ââ INCOME THRESHOLDS FOR 1 THE FIRSTHOME PROGRAM. 2 1. The Iowa finance authority shall conduct a review of 3 the firsthome program to analyze whether the household income 4 limit that has been established to determine eligibility for 5 the program provides adequate assistance to individuals in the 6 state to purchase their first home, and an adequate incentive 7 to out-of-state individuals to move to the state, and the 8 impact, if any, that increasing the household income limit 9 would have on participation in the program. 10 2. The Iowa finance authority shall submit a report to the 11 general assembly on or before January 11, 2027, that summarizes 12 the authorityâs findings and provides the authorityâs 13 recommendation for the household income that should be 14 established to determine eligibility for the firsthome program. 15